Maryland, session 2026, SB0153.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Election Law
1–101.
(a) In this article the following words have the meanings indicated unless a
different meaning is clearly intended from the context.
(j) “Campaign manager” means a person designated by a candidate[,] or [the
candidate’s representative,] CHAIR OF A CAMPAIGN FINANCE ENTITY to exercise general
overall responsibility for the conduct of the candidate’s political campaign.
(mm) “Responsible officers” means the [chairman] CHAIR and treasurer of a
political committee.
2–301.
(b) (1) An individual subject to this section may not, while holding the position:
(iii) except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, as to any
candidate or any matter that is subject to an election under this article:
1. be a campaign manager;

SENATE BILL 153 3
2. be a treasurer [or subtreasurer] for a campaign finance
entity; or
3. take any other active part in political management or a
political campaign.
13–207.
(c) To establish a political committee:
(1) a [chairman] CHAIR and a treasurer shall be appointed on a form that
the State Board prescribes and that is signed by the [chairman] CHAIR and treasurer and
includes:
(i) the residence addresses of the [chairman] CHAIR and the
treasurer;
(ii) if the [chairman] CHAIR and treasurer affirmatively consent to
receiving notice under this title only by electronic mail, the electronic mail address of the
[chairman] CHAIR and the treasurer; and
(iii) the information required by § 13–208 of this subtitle; and
(2) the form shall be filed with the State Board.
(3) THE CANDIDATE SHALL APPOINT THE CHAIR AND TREASURER OF
AN AUTHORIZED CANDIDATE CAMPAIGN COMMITTEE.
(3) (4) The [chairman] CHAIR or treasurer of a political committee shall
notify the State Board of a change in the residence address of the [chairman] CHAIR or
treasurer no later than 21 days before the day on which the political committee’s next
campaign finance report is due under § 13–309 of this title.
(4) (5) The [chairman] CHAIR or treasurer of a political committee shall
notify the State Board of a change in the electronic mail address of the [chairman] CHAIR
or treasurer by the date specified in paragraph (3) of this subsection if the [chairman]
CHAIR and treasurer of the political committee have affirmatively consented to receiving
notice under this title only by electronic mail.
(d) (1) A [chairman] CHAIR or treasurer of a political committee may resign
by completing a resignation form that the State Board prescribes and filing the form with
the State Board.

SENATE BILL 153
(2) If a vacancy occurs in the office of [chairman] CHAIR or the office of
treasurer, the political committee promptly shall appoint a new [chairman] CHAIR or
treasurer in accordance with this section.
(3) A political committee may not receive or disburse money or any other
thing of value if there is a vacancy in the office of [chairman] CHAIR or the office of
treasurer.
13–212.
[An individual] A CANDIDATE, CANDIDATE’S REPRESENTATIVE, OR CHAIR OF A
CAMPAIGN FINANCE ENTITY may appoint a campaign manager by:
(1) completing a form that the State Board prescribes and that includes the
name and address of that campaign manager; and
(2) filing the form with the [board where the individual is required to file
a certificate of candidacy] STATE BOARD.
13–215.
(a) Each [chairman] CHAIR, AND treasurer, and campaign manager shall be a
registered voter of the State.
(b) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, a candidate may not act:
(i) as the treasurer of a campaign finance entity of the candidate; or
(ii) with respect to any other campaign finance entity:
1. as [the campaign manager or treasurer] A RESPONSIBLE
OFFICER; or
2. in any other position that exercises general overall
responsibility for the conduct of the entity.
(2) (i) An incumbent member of a central committee who is a candidate
for election to party office may act as a responsible officer of that central committee.
(ii) With respect to any campaign finance entity other than the
candidate’s own campaign finance entity, a candidate for delegate to the Democratic
National Convention or a candidate for delegate to the Republican National Convention may
act:

SENATE BILL 153 5
1. as [the campaign manager or treasurer] A RESPONSIBLE
OFFICER; or
2. in any other position that exercises general overall
responsibility for the conduct of the entity.
(c) Subject to subsection (b) of this section, the [chairman] CHAIR, treasurer, or
campaign manager of a campaign finance entity may serve as the [chairman] CHAIR,
treasurer, or campaign manager of another campaign finance entity.
13–218.
(a) THE TREASURER IS THE FINANCIAL STEWARD OF THE CAMPAIGN
FINANCE ENTITY.
(B) All assets received by or on behalf of a campaign finance entity shall be:
(1) delivered to AND MANAGED BY the [treasurer] CAMPAIGN FINANCE
ENTITY; [and]
(2) maintained by the treasurer for the purposes of the campaign finance
entity;
(3) ACCOUNTED FOR IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 13–221 OF THIS
SUBTITLE; AND
(4) CONSIDERED OWNED BY THE CAMPAIGN FINANCE ENTITY.
[(b)] (C) (1) Assets of a campaign finance entity may be disbursed only:
(i) if [they have passed through the hands of the treasurer]
ACCOUNTED FOR IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 13–221 OF THIS SUBTITLE; and
(ii) in accordance with the purposes of the entity AND THIS TITLE.
(2) Subject to § 13–220(b)(2) and (c) of this subtitle and except as provided
in subsection [(d)] (E) of this section, the treasurer shall approve all disbursements for the
campaign finance entity.
[(c)] (D) (1) The treasurer of a State or county central committee of a political
party may not approve any disbursement of the central committee’s assets, or incur any
liability on its behalf, without authority and direction from the [chairman] CHAIR of the
central committee.

SENATE BILL 153
(2) THE TREASURER OF A POLITICAL ACTION COMMITTEE OF A
POLITICAL PARTY MAY NOT APPROVE ANY DISBURSEMENT OF THE POLITICAL
ACTION COMMITTEE’S ASSETS, OR INCUR ANY LIABILITY ON ITS BEHALF, WITHOUT
AUTHORITY AND DIRECTION FROM THE CHAIR OF THE POLITICAL ACTION
COMMITTEE.
[(d)] (E) [(1) If the treasurer of a campaign finance entity is temporarily
unable to perform the duties of the office, the chairman of the campaign finance entity may
approve a disbursement on behalf of the campaign finance entity in the same manner as
the treasurer.
(2) If the chairman approves a disbursement under this subsection, within
7 days after approving the disbursement, the chairman shall submit a report to the
treasurer for the account book of the campaign finance entity, including:
(i) a statement of the expenditure approved under the authority of
the chairman;
(ii) the name and address of the person to whom the expenditure was
made;
(iii) the purpose for which the expenditure was made; and
(iv) a copy of the receipt for the expenditure that was made.]
(1) THE TREASURER A CANDIDATE OR THE RESPONSIBLE OFFICERS
MAY DESIGNATE AUTHORIZED AGENTS OF THE CAMPAIGN FINANCE ENTITY TO MAKE
DISBURSEMENTS CARRY OUT DUTIES ON BEHALF OF AND IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE
PURPOSE OF THE CAMPAIGN FINANCE ENTITY.
(2) THE DESIGNATION OF AN AUTHORIZED AGENT MUST BE MADE IN
WRITING BEFORE THE FIRST DISBURSEMENT IS MADE BY THE AUTHORIZED AGENT.
(3) ANY ACTION TAKEN BY THE DESIGNATED AUTHORIZED AGENT ON
BEHALF OF THE CAMPAIGN FINANCE ENTITY IS THE RESPONSIBILITY OF THE
TREASURER.
(4) A DESIGNATED AUTHORIZED AGENT:
(I) HAS A FIDUCIARY DUTY TO THE CAMPAIGN FINANCE ENTITY
FOR THE AGENT’S CONDUCT IN MAKING DISBURSEMENTS ON BEHALF OF THE
CAMPAIGN FINANCE ENTITY; AND

SENATE BILL 153 7
(II) SHALL CONFIRM THE AGENT’S UNDERSTANDING OF THE
FIDUCIARY DUTY BY SIGNING THE WRITTEN DESIGNATION THAT INCLUDES A
STATEMENT OF THE DUTY.
(5) (2) A DESIGNATED AUTHORIZED AGENT MAY ASSIST THE
TREASURER IN THE PREPARATION OF ANY REQUIRED FILINGS WITH THE STATE
BOARD.
[(3)] (6) (3) A [chairman who is a] candidate may not [approve] HAVE A
CANDIDATE MAY NOT ACCESS TO, OR MAKE a disbursement for a campaign finance
entity FROM, FUNDS DEPOSITED IN THE DESIGNATED CAMPAIGN ACCOUNT
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 13–220 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(4) A CANDIDATE SHALL HAVE KNOWLEDGE OF ALL DISBURSEMENTS
MADE FROM THE DESIGNATED CAMPAIGN ACCOUNT OF THE CANDIDATE’S
AUTHORIZED CANDIDATE CAMPAIGN COMMITTEE.
13–220.
(e) Within 30 days after filing a campaign finance report at the State Board, the
treasurer of an authorized candidate campaign committee shall provide both the candidate
and the [chairman] CHAIR with a copy of the most recent campaign account bank
statement.
13–246.
A person who claims that money is due from a campaign finance entity shall present
a claim for payment to the treasurer [or subtreasurer] not later than 30 days after the
election for which the liability was incurred.
13–248.
If a responsible officer of a campaign finance entity has a compensation agreement
with the campaign finance entity, before making a disbursement for the compensation, the
campaign finance entity shall submit to the State Board:
(1) a copy of the compensation agreement; and
(2) if the campaign finance entity is an authorized candidate campaign
committee, the written consent of the candidate.
13–304.
(b) A campaign finance report filed by a campaign finance entity under subsection
(a) of this section shall include:

SENATE BILL 153
(1) the information required by the State Board with respect to all
contributions received and all expenditures made by or on behalf of the campaign finance
entity during the designated reporting period; [and]
(2) the information regarding the occupations and employers of
contributors required to be recorded by the treasurer of a campaign finance entity under §
13–221 of this title; AND
(3) THE WRITTEN DESIGNATIONS NAMING THE AUTHORIZED AGENTS
WHO MAY ACT ON THE TREASURER’S BEHALF, IF ANY.
13–604.1.
(b) The State Board may impose a civil penalty in accordance with this section for
the following violations:
(1) making a disbursement in a manner not [authorized in § 13–218(b)(2),
(c), and (d)] IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 13–218(C)(2), (D), AND (E)(6) (E)(3) of this title;
(d) (1) Except as otherwise provided in this title or as provided in paragraph
(2) of this subsection, the amount of a civil penalty imposed under this section may not
exceed $1,000 for each violation.
(2) As to a violation of § 13–235 of this title, the campaign finance entity
that receives a contribution as a result of a violation shall:
(i) refund the contribution to the contributor; and
(ii) pay a civil penalty that equals $1,000 plus the amount of the
contribution, unless the State Board at its discretion assesses a lesser penalty for good
cause.
(3) AS TO A VIOLATION OF § 13–218(E)(2) OR § 13–248 OF THIS TITLE,
THE CAMPAIGN FINANCE ENTITY OR OTHER PERSON THAT COMMITTED THE
VIOLATION SHALL PAY A CIVIL PENALTY THAT EQUALS $1,000 PLUS THE AMOUNT
OF THE DISBURSEMENT MADE WITHOUT THE REQUIRED APPROVAL.
(f) (1) Subject to paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection, a civil penalty
imposed under this section shall be paid by the campaign finance entity.
(2) If the campaign finance entity has insufficient funds with which to pay
the full amount of the civil penalty in a timely manner, after the campaign account of the
finance entity is exhausted the balance of the civil penalty is the joint and several liability
of the responsible officers.

SENATE BILL 153 9
(3) If a violation is committed by a person not acting on behalf of, or at the
request or suggestion of, a candidate or a campaign finance entity, the civil penalty shall
be paid by the person who committed the violation.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
January 1, 2027.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.